California statutes. Education Code
The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the electors of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter shall include approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100180.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Miscellaneous [100185. - 100185.]

100185.

(a) Any remaining funds resulting or derived from the sale of bonds pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 16400), Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 16500), Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 16600), Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 16700), Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 16800), Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 17000), Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 17100), Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 17200), Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 17300), Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 17400), and Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 17500), of Part 10, shall be transferred to the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund and may be apportioned by the State Allocation Board for the purposes of the Leroy F. Greene State School Building Lease-Purchase Law of 1976 (Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10).

(b) Any unsold bonds, authorized for issuance under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 16400), Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 16500), Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 16600), Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 16700), Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 16800), Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 17000), Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 17100), Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 17200), Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 17300), Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 17400), and Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 17500), of Part 10 may be sold by the Treasurer, upon authorization by the State School Building Finance Committee for the purposes of the Leroy F. Greene State School Building Lease-Purchase Law of 1976 (Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 203 at the March 26, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 68. PUBLIC EDUCATION BONDS [100400. - 100560.]



  CHAPTER 1. Class Size Reduction Kindergarten–University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 1998 [100400. - 100405.]

100400.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Class Size Reduction Kindergarten–University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100401.

The incorporation of, or reference to, any provisions of California statutory law in this part includes all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100403.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of nine billion two hundred million dollars ($9,200,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 100410) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 100450), or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this part and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee established by Section 15909 and the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100405.

For purposes of this part, “Chapter 12” means Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 10 and “Chapter 12.5” means Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade [100410. - 100446.]



  ARTICLE 1. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade School Facilities Program Provisions [100410. - 100420.]

100410.

(a) Three billion three hundred fifty million dollars ($3,350,000,000) of the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this part shall be deposited in the 1998 State School Facilities Fund, which is established by Section 17070.40, and allocated by the State Allocation Board pursuant to this chapter. Before requesting the sale of bonds pursuant to Section 100432 for deposit in the State School Facilities Fund, the State Allocation Board shall request, pursuant to Section 100432, the sale of bonds sufficient to finance all projects for which application was made pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene State School Building Lease-Purchase Law of 1976 (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 10) and for which an application was approved for construction, but funding was not available, prior to November 4, 1998.

(b) In addition to the amount specified in subdivision (a), three billion three hundred fifty million dollars ($3,350,000,000) of the bonds authorized by this chapter shall only be issued and sold pursuant to this chapter on or after July 1, 2000, and the proceeds of those bonds shall be deposited in the 1998 State School Facilities Fund and allocated by the State Allocation Board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100415.

(a) All moneys deposited in the 1998 State School Facilities Fund pursuant to this chapter shall be available and, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, are hereby appropriated to provide aid to school districts of the state in accordance with the Leroy F. Greene State School Building Lease-Purchase Law of 1976 (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 10) and in accordance with the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10), to provide aid to school districts, county superintendents of schools, and county boards of education of the state in accordance with Section 100420, to provide funds to repay any money advanced or loaned to the 1998 State School Facilities Fund under any act of the Legislature, together with interest provided for in that act, and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(b) The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall fund kindergarten and grades 1 through 12, inclusive, school constructions for a four-year period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100420.

(a) Of the proceeds from the sale of bonds, issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 100410, not more than three billion three hundred fifty million dollars ($3,350,000,000) shall be allocated beginning in the 1998–99 fiscal year in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Not less than one billion three hundred fifty million dollars ($1,350,000,000) for project funding related to the growth in enrollment of applicant school districts under Chapter 12 and Chapter 12.5 that have incurred or will incur enrollment increases.

(2) Not less than eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000) for the reconstruction or modernization of facilities pursuant to Chapter 12 and Chapter 12.5.

(3) Not more than five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) shall be deposited in the Public School Critical Hardship Account, which is hereby established in the 1998 State School Facilities Fund and shall be allocated by the State Allocation Board to fund critical hardships as defined in Chapter 12.5. These funds may be expended for the acquisition of portable classrooms for use in accordance with Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10.

(4) (A) Not more than seven hundred million dollars ($700,000,000) may be allocated to assist school districts with site acquisition and facilities-related costs of kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, that are in the Class Size Reduction Program contained in Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28 and Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 10, and to assist districts with the restoration of facilities that previously accommodated other programs and were displaced as a result of the implementation of class size reduction. On and after July 1, 2000, if applications for the total funds available under this paragraph have not been filed with the State Allocation Board, the funds for which applications have not been received may be allocated by the board to other high priority needs as the board determines. On and after July 1, 2003, any funds not allocated are available for other high priority needs.

(B) The funds allocated in subparagraph (A) shall be allocated to the State Department of Education to provide class size reduction facilities grants necessary to implement the K–3 Class Size Reduction Program established pursuant to Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28 and Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 10. The department shall certify to the State Allocation Board the amount of funds needed for this purpose. The board shall transfer the amount of funds needed to the department. From these funds, the department shall award eligible districts forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for each new option one class established for class size reduction for which the district had not previously received funding under class size reduction facilities programs.

(C) The remaining funds provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be to provide funding for schoolsites that were eligible to receive a class size reduction land-locked waiver pursuant to Section 52122.6. The funds may be provided to districts to provide 50 percent of the cost of funding a facilities mitigation plan developed for the impacted site pursuant to Section 52122.7.

(D) Any funds not expended pursuant to subparagraphs (A), (B), or (C) may be allocated to districts that request funding of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for each teaching station that (1) was displaced as a result of the implementation of class size reduction and (2) received less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) per teaching station in 1996–97 pursuant to Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 10. Programs for which teaching stations may be restored may include child care, extended day care, school libraries, computer labs, and special education classrooms.

(b) Of the proceeds from the sale of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 100410, not more than three billion three hundred fifty million dollars ($3,350,000,000) shall be allocated beginning in the 2000–01 fiscal year in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Not less than one billion five hundred fifty million dollars ($1,550,000,000) for project funding related to the growth in enrollment of applicant school districts under Chapter 12.5 that have incurred or will incur enrollment increases.

(2) Not less than one billion three hundred million dollars ($1,300,000,000) for the reconstruction or modernization of facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5.

(3) Not more than five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) shall be deposited in the Public School Critical Hardship Account in the 1998 State School Facilities Fund and shall be allocated by the State Allocation Board to fund critical hardships as defined in Chapter 12.5. These funds may be expended for the acquisition of portable classrooms for use in accordance with Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10.

(c) Districts may use funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) for one or more of the following purposes in accordance with Chapter 12.5:

(1) The purchase and installation of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials, and related costs.

(2) Construction projects or the purchase of furniture or equipment designed to increase school security or playground safety.

(3) The identification, assessment, or abatement in school facilities of hazardous asbestos.

(4) Project funding for high priority roof replacement projects.

(5) Any other renovation or modernization of facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5.

(d) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may be utilized to provide new construction grants, without regard to funding priorities, for applicant county boards of education under Chapter 12.5 that are eligible for that funding or classrooms for severely handicapped pupils and funding for classrooms for county community school pupils.

(e) (1) The Legislature may amend this section to adjust the minimum funding amounts specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) and the maximum funding amounts specified in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a), and to adjust the minimum funding amounts specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) and the maximum funding amount specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), by either of the following methods:

(A) By a statute, passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered in the respective journals, by not less than two-thirds of the membership in each house concurring, if the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purposes of, this chapter.

(B) By a statute that becomes effective only when approved by the voters.

(2) Amendments pursuant to this subdivision may adjust the amounts to be expended pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) or paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) or both, but may not increase or decrease the total amount to be expended pursuant to either subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 858, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, and approved in Prop. 1A on Nov. 3, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade School Facilities Fiscal Provisions [100425. - 100446.]

100425.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of six billion six hundred ninety-nine million nine hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($6,699,965,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 100444, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the state, and the full faith and credit of the state is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 15909 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 255, Sec. 5.   (AB 184)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

100427.

The State School Building Finance Committee, established by Section 15909 and composed of the Governor, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or their designated representatives, all of whom shall serve thereon without compensation, and a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum, is continued in existence for the purpose of this chapter. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. Two Members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two Members of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with and provide advice to the committee to the extent that the advisory participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. For the purposes of this chapter, the Members of the Legislature shall constitute an interim investigating committee on the subject of this chapter and, as that committee, shall have the powers and duties imposed upon those committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and the Assembly. The Director of Finance shall provide the assistance to the committee as it may require. The Attorney General of the state is the legal adviser of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100430.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law, except Section 16727 of the Government Code, apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the State Allocation Board is designated the “board” for purposes of administering the 1998 State School Facilities Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100432.

Upon request of the State Allocation Board from time to time, supported by a statement of the apportionments made and to be made for the purposes described in Sections 100415 and 100420, the State School Building Finance Committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to fund the apportionments and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to fund those apportionments progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100434.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100435.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 100440, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100436.

The State Allocation Board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account or any other approved form of interim financing, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100438.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100440.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the 1998 State School Facilities Fund consistent with this chapter. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100442.

All money deposited in the 1998 State School Facilities Fund, that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100444.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100446.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Higher Education Facilities [100450. - 100560.]



  ARTICLE 1. Program Provision [100450. - 100460.]

100450.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s economic and social prosperity relies on a higher education system that keeps pace with California’s growth. In the coming decades, the state’s economic prosperity will depend on increasing the productivity of the work force and on the ability to compete successfully in the world marketplace.

(b) The system of public higher education in this state includes the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and their respective off-campus centers. Each of these institutions plays a vital role in maintaining California’s dominance
 in higher education in the United States.

(c) Over the last several years, studies have been completed by the California Postsecondary Education Commission, the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to assess their long-term and short-term capital needs. Those studies demonstrate that the long-term and short-term needs total, in the aggregate, seven hundred fifty million dollars ($750,000,000) per year into the next century.

(d) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be used to fund construction on existing or new campuses and off-campus centers, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, the renovation and reconstruction of facilities, site acquisition, the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, which equipment shall have an
 average useful life of 10 years; and to provide funds for the payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings at the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

(e) The purposes of this article include assisting in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of California’s public higher education system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 33.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100455.

(a) Two billion five hundred million dollars ($2,500,000,000) of the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this part shall be deposited in the 1998 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund which is hereby established in the State Treasury. These funds shall be available for expenditure when appropriated.

(b) One billion two hundred fifty million dollars ($1,250,000,000) of the bonds described in subdivision (a), shall only be issued and sold pursuant to this chapter on or after July 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100457.

(a) Of the amount of bonds issued and sold pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 100455, one hundred sixty-five million dollars ($165,000,000) shall be allocated in the 2000–01 fiscal year to be available only for the following purposes:

(1) The development of new campuses of the University of California.

(2) The development of new campuses, small campuses with enrollments of less than 5,000 full-time equivalent students, and off-campus centers at the California State University and the California Community Colleges.

(b) The amount of the allocation of funds required pursuant to this section for the development of new campuses may be reduced by a future legislative act if the Legislature finds that state funds have been provided from sources other than the proceeds of bonds for capital outlay costs. The reduction shall be limited to the amount actually provided from sources other than bond proceeds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100460.

The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 is hereby authorized to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of providing funds to aid the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 34.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Higher Education Fiscal Provisions [100500. - 100560.]

100500.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of two billion five hundred million dollars ($2,500,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 100555, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100510.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law, except Section 16727 of the Government Code, apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, each state agency administering an appropriation of the 1998 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund is designated as the “board” for projects funded pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The proceeds of the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be available for the purpose of funding aid to the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges, for the construction on existing or new campuses, and their respective off-campus centers, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, renovation, and reconstruction of facilities, for the acquisition of sites upon which these facilities are to be constructed, for the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, which equipment shall have a useful life of at least 10 years, to provide funds for payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 35.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100520.

The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the apportionments for the purposes described in this chapter that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the purposes described in this chapter and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100525.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100530.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 100545, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100535.

The board, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 100510, may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account or any other approved form of interim financing, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 100510, shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100540.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100545.

(a) For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the 1998 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund consistent with this chapter. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(b) Any request forwarded to the Legislature and the Department of Finance for funds from this bond issue for expenditure for the purposes described in this chapter by the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges shall be accompanied by the five-year capital outlay plan. Requests forwarded by a university or college shall include a schedule that prioritizes the seismic retrofitting needed to significantly reduce, by the 2002–03 fiscal year, in the judgment of the particular university or college, seismic hazards in buildings identified as high priority by the university or college. Requests forwarded by the California Community Colleges shall be accompanied by a five-year capital outlay plan reflecting the needs and priorities of the community college system, prioritized on a statewide basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100550.

All money deposited in the 1998 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100555.
